California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1248, Sec. 3.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

769.55.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, for the purposes of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 520) through Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 675), inclusive of Part 1 of Division 1, the obligation of an insurer to furnish any notice to its insured required by law may be carried out by an insurer’s general agent, provided, however, that an insurer’s delegation of a notice obligation to a general agent shall not limit or negate the insurer’s responsibility or liability if the general agent fails to provide the required notice.

(b) As used in this section, “general agent” means an individual licensed as a property broker-agent and licensed as a casualty broker-agent
 who, pursuant to a written contract with an admitted insurer, manages the transaction of one or more classes of insurance written by the insurer and has the power to (1) appoint, supervise, and terminate local agents, (2) accept or decline risks, and (3) collect premium moneys from producing broker-agents.

(c) Nothing in this section shall provide an exemption from Article 5.4 (commencing with Section 769.80) to any property broker-agent and casualty broker-agent who is otherwise subject to that article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 4.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

769.56.

(a) A material change made by a health insurer, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 106, to the terms and conditions of a contract between the health insurer and a life and accident and health or sickness agent shall not become effective until the health insurer has delivered to the life and accident and health or sickness agent, at least 45 days prior to the effective date of the change, written or electronic notice indicating the change or changes to the contract. For purposes of this section, a “material change” is a change made to a provision of the contract affecting any of the following:

(1) Commissions, bonuses, and incentives paid to the life and accident and health or sickness agent.

(2) Right of survivorship.

(3) Indemnification of the life and accident and health or sickness agent by the health insurer.

(4) Errors and omissions coverage requirements for the life and accident and health or sickness agent.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The change to the contract is mutually agreed upon by the health insurer and the life and accident and health or sickness agent.

(2) The change to the contract is required by state or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 2.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.4. Managing General Agents [769.80. - 769.87.]

769.80.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the Managing General Agents Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

769.81.

As used in this article:

(a) “Actuary” means a person who is a member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries, the Casualty Actuarial Society, or the Society of Actuaries, and is qualified to sign a statement of actuarial opinion on loss reserves. 

(b) “Insurer” means any person, firm, association, or corporation duly licensed as an insurer and operating under a certificate of authority in this state. 

(c) “Managing General Agent” (MGA) means any person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation who negotiates and binds ceding reinsurance contracts on behalf of an insurer or manages all or part of the insurance business of an insurer (including the management of a separate division, department or underwriting office) and acts as an agent for that insurer whether known as an MGA, manager, or other similar term, who, with or without the authority, either separately or together with affiliates, produces, directly or indirectly, and underwrites an amount of gross direct written premium equal to or more than 5 percent of the policyholder surplus as reported in the last annual statement of the insurer in any one quarter or year together with one or more of the following: (1) adjusts or pays claims in excess of an amount determined by the commissioner, or (2) negotiates reinsurance on behalf of the insurer. 

Notwithstanding the above, the following persons shall not be considered as MGAs for the purposes of this act: 

(1) An employee of the insurer. 

(2) A United States manager of the United States branch of an alien insurer. 

(3) An underwriting manager which, pursuant to contract, manages the insurance operations of the insurer, is under common control with the insurer, subject to the holding company regulatory act, and whose compensation is not based on the volume of premiums written. 

(4) The attorney-in-fact authorized by and acting for the subscribers of a reciprocal insurer or interinsurance exchange under powers of attorney. 

(d) “Underwrite” means the authority to accept or reject risk on behalf of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

769.82.

(a) No producer shall act in the capacity of an MGA with respect to risks located in this state for an insurer that holds a certificate of authority unless that producer is licensed as a property broker-agent and casualty broker-agent, or as a life agent in this state.

(b) No producer shall act in the capacity of an MGA representing an insurer domiciled in this state with respect to risks located outside this state unless that producer is licensed as a property broker-agent and casualty broker-agent, or as a life agent in this state.

(c) The commissioner may require a fidelity bond in an amount acceptable to him or her
 for the protection of the insurer.

(d) The commissioner may require the MGA to maintain an errors and omissions policy. If a policy is not generally available at a reasonable cost, the commissioner may, by rule, suspend the requirement of this subdivision until that coverage becomes generally available at a reasonable cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 5.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

769.83.

No producer acting in the capacity of an MGA shall place business with an insurer unless there is in force a written contract between the parties which sets forth the responsibilities of each party and where both parties share responsibility for a particular function, specifies the division of such responsibilities, and which contains the following minimum provisions:

(a) The insurer may terminate the contract for cause upon written notice to the MGA. The insurer may suspend the underwriting authority of the MGA during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for termination.

(b) The MGA shall render accounts to the insurer detailing all transactions and remit all funds due under the contract to the insurer on not less than a monthly basis.

(c) All funds collected for the account of an insurer shall be held by the MGA in a fiduciary capacity in a bank or savings association the deposits of which are insured by the Bank Insurance Fund or the Savings Association Insurance Fund of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. This account shall be used for all payments on behalf of the insurer. The MGA may retain no more than three months estimated claims payments and allocated loss adjustment expenses. The requirements of this subdivision shall be in addition to the requirements of Sections 1734 and 1735.

(d) Separate records of business written by the MGA shall be maintained. The insurer shall have access to and the right to copy all accounts and records related to its business in a form usable by the insurer and the commissioner shall have access to all books, bank accounts, and records of the MGA in a form usable to the commissioner. Those records shall be retained by the MGA, and shall be the joint property of the insurer and MGA.

(e) The contract may not be assigned in whole or part by the MGA.

(f) Appropriate underwriting guidelines including:

(1) The maximum annual premium volume.

(2) The basis of the rates to be charged.

(3) The types of risks which may be written.

(4) Maximum limits of liability.

(5) Applicable exclusions.

(6) Territorial limitations.

(7) Policy cancellation provisions.

(8) The maximum policy period.

The insurer shall have the right to cancel or nonrenew any policy of insurance, except as limited by any other provision of this code.

(g) If the contract permits the MGA to settle claims on behalf of the insurer:

(1) All claims shall be reported to the insurer in a timely manner.

(2) A copy of the claim file shall be sent to the insurer at its request or as soon as it becomes known that the claim is subject to any of the following:

(A) Has the potential to exceed an amount determined by the commissioner or exceeds the limit set by the company, whichever is less.

(B) Involves a coverage dispute.

(C) May exceed the MGA’s claims settlement authority.

(D) Is open for more than six months.

(E) Is closed by payment of an amount set by the commissioner or an amount set by the insurer, whichever is less.

(3) All claim files shall be the joint property of the insurer and MGA. However, upon an order of liquidation of the insurer such files shall become the sole property of the insurer or its estate; the MGA shall have reasonable access to and the right to copy the files on a timely basis.

(4) Any settlement authority granted to the MGA may be terminated for cause upon the insurer’s written notice to the MGA or upon the termination of the contract. The insurer may suspend the settlement authority during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for termination.

(h) Where electronic claims files are in existence, the contract shall address the timely transmission of the data.

(i) If the contract provides for a sharing of interim profits by the MGA, and the MGA has the authority to determine the amount of the interim profits by establishing loss reserves or controlling claim payments, or in any other manner, interim profits will not be paid to the MGA until one year after they are earned for property insurance business and five years after they are earned on casualty business and not until the profits have been verified pursuant to Section 769.84.

(j) The MGA shall not do any of the following:

(1) Bind reinsurance or retrocessions on behalf of the insurer, except that the MGA may bind facultative reinsurance contracts pursuant to obligatory facultative agreements if the contract with the insurer contains reinsurance underwriting guidelines including, for both reinsurance assumed and ceded, a list of reinsurers with which such automatic agreements are in effect, the coverages and amounts or percentages that may be reinsured and commission schedules. This paragraph shall not operate to prohibit transactions which are subject to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1781.1) of Part 2 of Division 1, if the MGA has complied with all of the requirements of that chapter.

(2) Commit the insurer to participate in insurance or reinsurance syndicates.

(3) Appoint any agent without assuring that the agent is lawfully licensed to transact the type of insurance for which he or she is appointed.

(4) Without prior approval of the insurer, pay or commit the insurer to pay a claim over a specified amount, net of reinsurance, which shall not exceed 1 percent of the insurer’s policyholder’s surplus as of December 31 of the last completed calendar year.

(5) Collect any payment from a reinsurer or commit the insurer to any claim settlement with a reinsurer, without prior approval of the insurer. If prior approval is given, a report shall be promptly forwarded to the insurer.

(6) Permit any agent appointed pursuant to paragraph (3) to serve on the insurer’s board of directors.

(7) Jointly employ an individual who is employed with the insurer.

(8) Appoint a sub-MGA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   Effective July 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

769.84.

(a) The insurer shall have on file an independent financial examination, in a form acceptable to the commissioner, of each MGA with which it has done business. 

(b) If an MGA establishes loss reserves, the insurer shall annually obtain the opinion of an actuary attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and outstanding on business produced by the MGA. This is in addition to any other required loss reserve certification. 

(c) The insurer shall periodically (at least semiannually) conduct an onsite review of the underwriting and claims processing operations of the MGA. 

(d) Binding authority for all reinsurance contracts or participation in insurance or reinsurance syndicates shall rest with an officer of the insurer, who shall not be affiliated with the MGA. 

(e) Within 30 days of entering into or termination of a contract with an MGA, the insurer shall provide written notification of such appointment or termination to the commissioner. Notices of appointment of an MGA shall include a statement of duties which the applicant is expected to perform on behalf of the insurer, the lines of insurance for which the applicant is to be authorized to act, and any other information the commissioner may request. 

(f) An insurer shall review its books and records each quarter to determine if any producer has become, by operation of Section 769.81, an MGA as defined in that section. If the insurer determines that a producer has become an MGA pursuant to the above, the insurer shall promptly notify the producer and the commissioner of that determination and the insurer and the producer shall fully comply with this article within 30 days. 

(g) An insurer shall not appoint to its board of directors an officer, director, employee, any agent appointed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 769.83, or controlling shareholder of its MGAs. This subdivision shall not apply to relationships governed by Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

769.85.

The acts of the MGA are considered to be the acts of the insurer on whose behalf it is acting. An MGA may be examined as if it were the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

769.86.

(a) If the commissioner finds after hearing that any person has violated any provision of this article he or she may order any of the following: 

(1) For each separate violation, a penalty in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). 

(2) Revocation or suspension of the producer’s license. 

(b) Hearings held pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the hearings shall be conducted by administrative law judges chosen under Section 11502 or appointed by the commissioner. 

(c) The decision, determination, or order of the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to judicial review. 

(d) Nothing contained in this section shall affect the right of the commissioner to impose any other penalties provided for in this code, nor limit any other authority required or authorized by this code to be exercised by the commissioner. 

(e) Nothing contained in this article is intended to or shall in any manner limit or restrict the rights of policyholders, claimants, and auditors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

769.87.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Insurance in Connection With Sales and Loans [770. - 776.]

770.

No person engaged in the business of financing the purchase of real or personal property or of lending money on the security of real or personal property and no trustee, director, officer, agent or other employee, or affiliate of, any such person shall require, as a condition precedent to financing the purchase of such property or to loaning money upon the security thereof, or as a condition prerequisite for the renewal or extension of any such loan or for the performance of any other act in connection therewith, that the person for whom such purchase is to be financed or to whom the money is to be loaned or for whom such extension, renewal or other act is to be granted or performed negotiate any insurance or renewal thereof covering such property through a particular insurance agent or broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 224.)
-------------------------------------------

770.1.

No person making a loan of money on the security of real property shall use or make available to any person information contained in a policy of fire or casualty insurance for the purpose of soliciting either type of insurance coverage if the borrower has filed with the lender a statement signed by the borrower that the policy information shall not be so used or made available. The statement may be included by the borrower in his or her letter of authorization designating an insurance agent or broker to the lender. The statement or letter of authorization shall be effective until superseded or revoked by the borrower. This section shall not apply to any person authorized or licensed to make loans pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000), Division 10 (commencing with Section 24000), or Division 11 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1229, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

770.3.

No state department or agency shall negotiate any life or disability insurance or require the placing of that insurance through particular agents, brokers, or companies, except to the extent that the state has a direct financial interest in the subject of the insurance. The state has no financial interest in an annuity purchased for an employee if the premium therefor is paid from a deduction from or reduction in the employee’s salary, and any annuity paid for through a deduction or reduction shall not be deemed to have been provided by the state for its employees for purposes of this section, and the state shall not negotiate or require the placing of the annuity through particular agents, brokers, or companies. Nothing contained in this section shall affect the program of life and disability insurance in connection with veterans’ farm and home purchases through the Department of Veterans Affairs except that the total life insurance benefit under that program shall in no event exceed 120 percent of the unpaid contract balance. Except in those cases where the premium for an annuity is paid entirely from a deduction from or reduction in an employee’s salary, nothing contained in this section shall affect life or disability insurance programs which may be provided by the state for its employees.

Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, in any case in which a tax-sheltered annuity under an annuity plan which meets the requirements of Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 is to be placed or purchased for an employee, the employee shall have the right to designate the licensed agent, broker, or company through whom the employee’s employer shall arrange for the placement or purchase of the tax-sheltered annuity. In any case in which the employee has designated an agent, broker, or company, the employer shall comply with that designation, except in the case of a designation subject to Section 1153 or Section 12420.2 of the Government Code, or Section 24950 of the Education Code.

As used in this section, “state department or agency” shall include, but not be limited to, school districts.

This section shall apply to all local governmental agencies, as well as state departments and agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 230, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

771.

Sections 770 and 770.1 shall not prevent:

(a) The exercise by any person engaged in that business of that person’s right to approve or disapprove, for reasonable cause, as determined by appropriate regulatory authority, of the insurer selected to underwrite the insurance, nor of that person’s right to furnish insurance or to renew any insurance required by the contract of sale or trust deed or other loan agreement if the borrower or purchaser shall have failed to furnish the insurance or renewal thereof within a reasonable time or form as may be specified in the sale or loan agreement. The lender shall not refuse to accept insurance provided by an acceptable insurer on the ground that the insurance provides more coverage than is required in the sale or loan agreement, unless the additional
 coverage consists of automobile, life, or disability insurance.

The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, in conjunction with the Insurance Commissioner, shall issue appropriate regulations defining “reasonable cause.”

(b) Any lender from recommending to any borrower or prospective borrower the placing of insurance with a specified insurer or through a specified insurance agent or broker as long as the recommendation, with respect to a sale of real property or a loan upon the security of real property, clearly sets forth both the name and the mailing address of the recommended insurer or insurance agent or broker and does not violate the provisions of Section 770 or of any other section of this code. On and after July 1, 1972, the recommendation clearly setting forth the name and the mailing address of the recommended insurer or insurance agent or broker shall be in writing.

(c) The free choice of insurance agent or broker by any borrower or purchaser at any time, and the borrower or purchaser may revoke any designation of insurance agent or broker at any time irrespective of the provisions of any loan or purchase agreement or trust deed.

(d) The exercise of any person engaged in that business of that person’s right to furnish insurance or to renew insurance, and to charge the account of the borrower or purchaser with the costs thereof, if the borrower or purchaser fails to deliver to the lender the insurance at least 30 days prior to the expiration of the policy. If an insurance policy renewing or replacing, at expiration time, the policy then in force is received by the lender less than 15 days prior to the expiration of the policy held by the lender, or if an insurance policy procured by the borrower or purchaser is subsequently substituted for that
 then in force, the lender may impose a reasonable service charge as determined by the Insurance Commissioner for the transaction, the payment of which charge by the agent or broker is not a violation of any other provision of this code. No service charges shall be imposed for normal insurance changes made during the term of the policy.

(e) The commissioner is authorized to adopt a uniform statewide schedule of permissive maximum charges for the substitution of policies authorized in subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 193.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

771.01.

No person making a loan of money on the security of residential real property shall reject or refuse to accept a policy of fire and casualty insurance underwritten by an insurer chosen by the borrower for any reason that the lender would not impose on an insurer chosen by the lender when the borrower requests the lender to obtain the insurance. This section applies to a lender’s rejection or refusal to accept a policy of fire and casualty insurance due to, but not limited to, terms of coverage, conditions of payment, or financial rating of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 857, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

771.02.

(a) When a lender or purchaser of a mortgage on real property has required and obtained a copy of the insurance policy covering that real property, it shall be responsible for providing a copy of that insurance policy or other evidence of insurance acceptable to the purchaser to a subsequent purchaser of the mortgage, servicing agent, or insurance tracking service with whom the lender or purchaser of the mortgage subsequently contracts. A copy of the policy or other evidence of insurance shall be provided so that the subsequent purchaser, servicing agent, or insurance tracking service may verify that the borrower has obtained or is maintaining insurance required by the mortgage.
 This section does not abrogate the responsibility of an insurer, agent, or broker to provide annually, if requested, a copy of the insurance policy directly to the lender or purchaser of the mortgage named as an additional loss payee or lienholder at an address provided by the lender or purchaser of the mortgage.

(b) A copy of the insurance policy or other evidence of insurance acceptable to the purchaser may be provided electronically to the subsequent purchaser of the mortgage, servicing agent, or insurance tracking service with whom the lender or purchaser of the mortgage subsequently contracts, if that party agrees to electronic service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 433, Sec. 10.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

771.1.

Nothing in this article shall prevent any person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code from recommending, soliciting, negotiating or effecting home protection contracts issued by a company qualified under Part 7 (commencing with Section 12740) of Division 2, in connection with his or her licensed function authorized by Sections 10131 or 10131.6 of the Business and Professions Code, notwithstanding that such person is not a fire and casualty licensee as defined in Section 1625.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1203.)
-------------------------------------------

772.

In any trial, hearing or proceeding to determine a violation of this article a written statement signed by the person for whom any purchase is financed, to whom any money is loaned or for whom any extension, renewal or other act in connection with a loan is to be granted or performed, declaring that such person voluntarily chooses the insurance agent or broker through whom the insurance or its renewal was transacted, and that the choice of such insurance agent, or broker was not made a condition precedent to such purchase, loan, extension, renewal or other act shall be prima facie evidence that no violation of Section 770 has occurred, if the borrower or purchaser in his own handwriting shall have written the name of his chosen insurance agent or broker into an authorization of such insurance agent or broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 224.)
-------------------------------------------

773.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke any license held by any person who violates Section 770, pursuant to Article 13 of Chapter 5 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

774.

The commissioner, after hearing upon notice, may issue a cease and desist order to any person if he finds that such person has, in more than one transaction, violated Section 770. The violation of such a cease and desist order is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 224.)
-------------------------------------------

775.

The commissioner may investigate any person, whether licensed or not, for the purpose of determining if there has been any violation of this article, however, if such investigation be upon a complaint, the complainant must be a party to the contract of sale, trust deed, or loan agreement and must make such complaint within three months of the execution or any modification thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 224.)
-------------------------------------------

776.

No person who sells real property shall require, as a condition precedent to the sale of such real property, that the person buying the real property negotiate any insurance or renewal thereof covering such property through a particular insurance agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.7. Free Insurance [777.1. - 777.3.]

777.1.

No insurer shall participate in any plan to offer or effect any kind or kinds of insurance or annuities in this state as an inducement to the purchase or rental by the public of any property, real or personal or mixed, or services, without any separate charge to the insured for such insurance, nor shall any agent, broker, or solicitor arrange the sale of any such insurance. The provisions of this article shall not be applicable to insurance written in connection with subscriptions to newspapers of general circulation; nor shall it apply to insurance issued to credit unions or to members of credit unions in connection with the purchase of shares in such a credit union; nor shall it apply to insurance offered as a guarantee of the performance of goods, which insurance is designed to protect the purchasers or users of such goods; nor shall it be applicable to any title insurance or life or disability insurance written in connection with an indebtedness, the purpose of which insurance is to pay the balance of the indebtedness in the event of the death or disability of the person insured; nor shall it be applicable to any of the provisions of Part 5 (commencing at Section 12140), Division 2 of this code; nor shall it be applicable to insurance provided incidentally to the sale of services if the cost of the insurance to the seller of the services does not exceed the sum of one dollar ($1) per annum for each purchaser of those services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

777.2.

If any insurer, agent, broker or solicitor wilfully violates the provisions of this article, the Insurance Commissioner may suspend or revoke his certificate or license or other authority to do business or engage in his occupation for a period not exceeding one year. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 520.)
-------------------------------------------

777.3.

As used in this article “insurer” includes any person or organization to which Article 4 (commencing with Section 730), Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1 is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 265.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.8. Premium Financing [778. - 778.4.]

778.

As used in this article, “premium financing” means engaging in the business of advancing money, directly or indirectly, to an insurer or producer at the request of an insured pursuant to the terms of a premium finance agreement, wherein the insured has assigned the unearned premiums, accrued dividends, or loss payments as security for such advancement in payment of premiums on insurance contracts only, and does not include the financing of insurance contract premiums purchased in connection with the financing of goods and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1103.)
-------------------------------------------

778.1.

As used in this article, “premium finance agreement” means a loan contract, note, agreement, or obligation by which an insured agrees to pay to a lender in installments the principal amount advanced by the lender to an insurer or producer in payment of premium on an insurance contract or contracts, plus charges, with the assignment, as security therefor, of the unearned premiums, accrued dividends, or loss payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1103.)
-------------------------------------------

778.2.

(a) Any person engaged in business as an insurance agent or broker and who participates in the arrangement of a premium financing agreement shall, if he accepts compensation for arranging, directing, or performing services in connection with the premium financing agreement, disclose to the insured, in a manner and form established by the commissioner, the amount of compensation he is to receive from the premium financer and maintain for three years and make available to the commissioner a list of accounts in connection with which he has accepted compensation for premium financing services showing the amount of such compensation with respect to each premium financing agreement and with respect to each financing schedule used by the agent or broker. The requirements of this subdivision shall not apply with respect to interest paid to the broker or agent by the premium financer based upon delay in payment of the premium due the insurer as permitted under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 18628 of the Financial Code.

(b) The commissoner shall hold a hearing and adopt by regulation a standard procedure and form for making the disclosure to the insured required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 356, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

778.3.

The amount of the periodic finance charges, if any, imposed for the premium financing purchased and the annual percentage rate associated with those charges shall be disclosed in the policy itself, or if arranged pursuant to a separate premium financing agreement in the premium financing agreement itself, and in the premium finance billings. If the finance charge is a fixed fee, regardless of the amount of the loan or the balance due, the disclosure is not required to include the annual percentage rate associated with those charges. This section shall not apply to any insurance policy or premium finance billing if the same information is otherwise disclosed to the insured as required by any other provision of state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

778.4.

(a) Every property broker-agent and every casualty broker-agent shall, prior to arranging premium financing for any new or renewal policy of insurance specified in Section 660, do all of the following:

(1) Provide the applicant or prospective insured with any information that is required by the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

(2) Obtain the signature of the applicant or prospective insured on the following disclosure, which shall be in 10-point boldface type on a separate form or sheet of paper:

Some insurance companies and the California Automobile
 Assigned Risk Plan (CAARP) provide the opportunity to make payments on insurance premiums. Your agent or broker is required to disclose these options, if any are available for the insurance you are purchasing. If you choose to enter into a contract that provides for premium financing, your agent is required by law to make certain disclosures concerning interest, fees, or other charges. If your insurance has been financed by any person or business other than your insurance company, and your insurance is canceled for any reason, your loan may be subject to continued interest charges, or other charges that may result from delays by your insurance company in repaying the premium finance company. You should understand all of the charges associated with your financing plan. If you are uncertain about how the financing plan works, you should ask your insurance agent or broker.

(b) Every property broker-agent and every casualty broker-agent shall
 comply with the requirements of the Consumer Contract Awareness Act of 1990 (Title 1.86 (commencing with Section 1799.200) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) to the extent that its provisions are applicable to any transaction subject to this section.

(c) If a transaction subject to subdivision (a) is conducted over the telephone, the property broker-agent and the casualty broker-agent shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of subdivision (a) if, within 72 hours after transacting the contract or agreement, the disclosure form and other information required by subdivision (a) is mailed to the applicant or insured at the address provided by the applicant or insured. Proof of mailing shall be established by the method described in Section 38.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 6.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.9. Credit Life and Disability Insurance [779.1. - 779.36.]

779.1.

The purpose of this article is to promote the public welfare by regulating credit life insurance and credit disability insurance. Nothing in this article is intended to prohibit or discourage reasonable competition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1316, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

779.2.

All life insurance and all disability insurance sold in connection with loans or other credit transactions shall be subject to the provisions of this article, except (a) such insurance sold in connection with a loan or other credit transaction of more than 10 years duration, and (b) such insurance where its issuance is an isolated transaction on the part of the insurer not related to an agreement or a plan or regular course of conduct for insuring debtors of the creditor. Nothing in this article shall be construed to relieve any person from compliance with any other applicable law of this state, including, but not limited to, Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790), nor shall anything in this article be construed so as to alter, amend, or otherwise affect existing case law.

For the purpose of this article:

(1) “Credit life insurance” means insurance on the life of a debtor pursuant to or in connection with a specific loan or other credit transaction, exclusive of any such insurance procured at no expense to the debtor. Insurance shall be deemed procured at no expense to the debtor unless the cost of the credit transaction to the debtor varies depending on whether or not the insurance is procured.

(2) “Credit disability insurance” means insurance on a debtor to provide indemnity for payments becoming due on a specific loan or other credit transaction while the debtor is disabled as defined in the policy, exclusive of any insurance procured at no expense to the debtor. Insurance shall be deemed to have been procured at no expense to the debtor unless the cost of the credit transaction to the debtor varies depending on whether or not the insurance is procured.

(3) “Creditor” means the lender of money or vendor or lessor of goods, services, property, rights or privileges, for which payment is arranged through a credit transaction or any successor to the right, title or interest of any such lender, vendor or lessor, and an affiliate, associate or subsidiary of any of them or any director, officer or employee of any of them or any other person in any way associated with any of them.
